Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 2
MEETINGS AND ACTION
OF THE BOARD

7-128-201. Meetings.

The board of directors may hold regular or special meetings in or out of this state.

Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, the board of directors may permit any director to participate in a regular or special meeting by, or conduct the meeting through the use of, any means of communication by which all directors participating may hear each other during the meeting. A director participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to be present in person at the meeting.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 692, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-128-202. Action without meeting.

Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, any action required or permitted by articles 121 to 137 of this title to be taken at a board of directors' meeting may be taken without a meeting if notice is transmitted in writing to each member of the board and each member of the board by the time stated in the notice:

Votes in writing for such action; or

Votes in writing against such action, abstains in writing from voting, or fails to respond or vote; and

Fails to demand in writing that action not be taken without a meeting.

The notice required by subsection (1) of this section shall state:

The action to be taken;

The time by which a director must respond;

That failure to respond by the time stated in the notice will have the same effect as abstaining in writing by the time stated in the notice and failing to demand in writing by the time stated in the notice that action not be taken without a meeting; and

Any other matters the nonprofit corporation determines to include.

Action is taken under this section only if, at the end of the time stated in the notice transmitted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section:

The affirmative votes in writing for such action received by the nonprofit corporation and not revoked pursuant to subsection (5) of this section equal or exceed the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to take such action at a meeting at which all of the directors then in office were present and voted; and

The nonprofit corporation has not received a written demand by a director that such action not be taken without a meeting other than a demand that has been revoked pursuant to subsection (5) of this section.

A director's right to demand that action not be taken without a meeting shall be deemed to have been waived unless the nonprofit corporation receives such demand from the director in writing by the time stated in the notice transmitted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and such demand has not been revoked pursuant to subsection (5) of this section.

Any director who in writing has voted, abstained, or demanded action not be taken without a meeting pursuant to this section may revoke such vote, abstention, or demand in writing received by the nonprofit corporation by the time stated in the notice transmitted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Unless the notice transmitted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section states a different effective date, action taken pursuant to this section shall be effective at the end of the time stated in the notice transmitted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

A writing by a director under this section shall be in a form sufficient to inform the nonprofit corporation of the identity of the director, the vote, abstention, demand, or revocation of the director, and the proposed action to which such vote, abstention, demand, or revocation relates. Unless otherwise provided by the bylaws, all communications under this section may be transmitted or received by the nonprofit corporation by electronically transmitted facsimile, e-mail, or other form of wire or wireless communication. For purposes of this section, communications to the nonprofit corporation are not effective until received.

Action taken pursuant to this section has the same effect as action taken at a meeting of directors and may be described as such in any document.

All writings made pursuant to this section shall be filed with the minutes of the meetings of the board of directors.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 693, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 98:

(1)(b)(II) and (3) amended, p. 624, § 29, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(3) amended, p. 2341, § 305, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 36, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2009:

Entire section R&RE, (HB 09-1248), ch. 252, p. 1134, § 20, effective May 14.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 16, Session Laws of Colorado 2008.

7-128-203. Notice of meeting - rights of residential members.

Unless otherwise provided in articles 121 to 137 of this title or in the bylaws, regular meetings of the board of directors may be held without notice of the date, time, place, or purpose of the meeting.

Unless the bylaws provide for a longer or shorter period, special meetings of the board of directors shall be preceded by at least two days' notice of the date, time, and place of the meeting. The notice need not describe the purpose of the special meeting unless otherwise required by articles 121 to 137 of this title or the bylaws.

Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, and notwithstanding any provision of the articles of incorporation or bylaws to the contrary, the following rules and procedures apply to meetings of the board of directors of a residential nonprofit corporation or any committee of the board:

All regular and special meetings of the residential nonprofit corporation's board of directors or executive committee, or any committee of the board that is authorized to take final action on the board's behalf, must be open to attendance by all residential members or their representatives. The board shall make agendas for meetings of the board, and agendas for meetings of committees of the board that are authorized to take final action on the board's behalf, reasonably available for examination in advance by all residential members or their representatives. If there is no formal agenda, residential members or their representatives are nonetheless entitled to a general description of the purpose of the meeting and the subject matter that will be discussed.
(a) (I) (A) All regular and special meetings of the residential nonprofit corporation's board of directors or executive committee, or any committee of the board that is authorized to take final action on the board's behalf, must be open to attendance by all residential members or their representatives. The board shall make agendas for meetings of the board, and agendas for meetings of committees of the board that are authorized to take final action on the board's behalf, reasonably available for examination in advance by all residential members or their representatives. If there is no formal agenda, residential members or their representatives are nonetheless entitled to a general description of the purpose of the meeting and the subject matter that will be discussed.

The board shall inform all members, at least annually, of the method by which meeting agendas and other information required by sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (I) will be provided, including the physical location of places where agendas and meeting notices may be posted or the web address where online postings may be made. The board shall give at least thirty days' advance notice of any change in the manner or means by which meeting information will be provided.

The residential nonprofit corporation is encouraged to provide all notices and agendas required by this article in electronic form, by posting on a website or otherwise, in addition to printed form. If such electronic means are available, the corporation shall provide notice of all regular and special meetings of residential members by electronic mail to all residential members who so request and who furnish the corporation with their electronic mail addresses. Electronic notice of a special meeting must be given as soon as possible but at least twenty-four hours before the meeting.

At an appropriate time determined by the board of directors, but before the board votes on an issue under discussion, the board shall permit residential members or their designated representatives to speak regarding the issue. The board may place reasonable time restrictions on persons speaking during the meeting. If more than one person desires to address an issue and there are opposing views, the board shall provide for a reasonable number of persons to speak on each side of the issue.

The board of directors or any committee of the board may hold an executive or closed-door session and may restrict attendance to board members and such other persons requested by the board during a regular or specially announced meeting or a part thereof. The matters to be discussed at such an executive session may include only matters enumerated in paragraph (d) of this subsection (3).

Matters for discussion by an executive or closed session are limited to:

Matters pertaining to employees of the residential nonprofit corporation or the managing agent's contract or involving the employment, promotion, discipline, or dismissal of an officer, agent, or employee of the corporation;

Consultation with legal counsel concerning disputes that are the subject of pending or imminent court proceedings or matters that are privileged or confidential between attorney and client;

Investigative proceedings concerning possible or actual criminal misconduct;

Matters subject to specific constitutional, statutory, or judicially imposed requirements protecting particular proceedings or matters from public disclosure;

Any matter the disclosure of which would constitute an unwarranted invasion of individual privacy;

Review of or discussion relating to any written or oral communication from legal counsel.

Upon the final resolution of any matter for which the board of directors received legal advice or that concerned pending or contemplated litigation, the board may elect to preserve the attorney-client privilege in any appropriate manner, or it may elect to disclose such information, as it deems appropriate, about such matter in an open meeting.

Before the board of directors or any committee of the board convenes in executive session, the chair of the body shall announce the general matter of discussion as enumerated in paragraph (d) of this subsection (3).

The board of directors shall not adopt any change to the residential nonprofit corporation's articles of incorporation or bylaws during an executive session. An articles of incorporation or bylaw change may be validly adopted only during a regular or special meeting or after the board of directors goes back into regular session following an executive session.

The minutes of all meetings at which an executive session was held must indicate that an executive session was held and the general subject matter of the executive session.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 694, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2011:

(3) added, (HB 11-1110), ch. 22, p. 55, § 3, effective March 11.

L. 2012:

(3)(a)(I) amended, (SB 12-024), ch. 39, p. 137, § 2, effective March 22.

7-128-204. Waiver of notice.

A director may waive any notice of a meeting before or after the time and date of the meeting stated in the notice. Except as provided by subsection (2) of this section, the waiver shall be in writing and signed by the director entitled to the notice. Such waiver shall be delivered to the nonprofit corporation for filing with the corporate records, but such delivery and filing shall not be conditions of the effectiveness of the waiver.

A director's attendance at or participation in a meeting waives any required notice to that director of the meeting unless:

At the beginning of the meeting or promptly upon the director's later arrival, the director objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting because of lack of notice or defective notice and does not thereafter vote for or assent to action taken at the meeting; or

If special notice was required of a particular purpose pursuant to section 7-128-203 (2), the director objects to transacting business with respect to the purpose for which such special notice was required and does not thereafter vote for or assent to action taken at the meeting with respect to such purpose.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 694, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-128-205. Quorum and voting.

Unless a greater or lesser number is required by the bylaws, a quorum of a board of directors consists of a majority of the number of directors in office immediately before the meeting begins.

The bylaws may authorize a quorum of a board of directors to consist of:

No fewer than one-third of the number of directors fixed if the corporation has a fixed board size; or

No fewer than one-third of the number of directors fixed or, if no number is fixed, of the number in office immediately before the meeting begins, if a range for the size of the board is established pursuant to section 7-128-103 (2).

If a quorum is present when a vote is taken, the affirmative vote of a majority of directors present is the act of the board of directors unless the vote of a greater number of directors is required by articles 121 to 137 of this title or the bylaws.

If provided in the bylaws, for purposes of determining a quorum with respect to a particular proposal, and for purposes of casting a vote for or against a particular proposal, a director may be deemed to be present at a meeting and to vote if the director has granted a signed written proxy to another director who is present at the meeting, authorizing the other director to cast the vote that is directed to be cast by the written proxy with respect to the particular proposal that is described with reasonable specificity in the proxy. Except as provided in this subsection (4) and as permitted by section 7-128-202, directors may not vote or otherwise act by proxy.

A director who is present at a meeting of the board of directors when corporate action is taken is deemed to have assented to all action taken at the meeting unless:

The director objects at the beginning of the meeting, or promptly upon the director's arrival, to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting and does not thereafter vote for or assent to any action taken at the meeting;

The director contemporaneously requests that the director's dissent or abstention as to any specific action taken be entered in the minutes of the meeting; or

The director causes written notice of the director's dissent or abstention as to any specific action to be received by the presiding officer of the meeting before adjournment of the meeting or by the nonprofit corporation promptly after adjournment of the meeting.

The right of dissent or abstention pursuant to subsection (5) of this section as to a specific action is not available to a director who votes in favor of the action taken.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 694, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-128-206. Committees of the board.

Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws and subject to the provisions of section 7-129-106, the board of directors may create one or more committees of the board and appoint one or more directors to serve on them.

Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, the creation of a committee of the board and appointment of directors to it shall be approved by the greater of a majority of all the directors in office when the action is taken or the number of directors required by the bylaws to take action under section 7-128-205.

Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, sections 7-128-201 to 7-128-205, which govern meetings, action without meeting, notice, waiver of notice, and quorum and voting requirements of the board of directors, apply to committees of the board and their members as well.

To the extent stated in the bylaws or by the board of directors, each committee of the board shall have the authority of the board of directors under section 7-128-101; except that a committee of the board shall not:

Authorize distributions;

Approve or propose to members action that articles 121 to 137 of this title require to be approved by members;

Elect, appoint, or remove any director;

Amend articles of incorporation pursuant to section 7-130-102;

Adopt, amend, or repeal bylaws;

Approve a plan of conversion or plan of merger not requiring member approval; or

Approve a sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, of its property, with or without goodwill, otherwise than in the usual and regular course of business subject to approval by members.

The creation of, delegation of authority to, or action by a committee does not alone constitute compliance by a director with the standards of conduct described in section 7-128-401.

Nothing in this part 2 shall prohibit or restrict a nonprofit corporation from establishing in its bylaws or by action of the board of directors or otherwise one or more committees, advisory boards, auxiliaries, or other bodies of any kind, having such members and rules of procedure as the bylaws or board of directors may provide, in order to provide such advice, service, and assistance to the nonprofit corporation, and to carry out such duties and responsibilities for the nonprofit corporation, as may be stated in the bylaws or by the board of directors; except that, if any such committee or other body has one or more members thereof who are entitled to vote on committee matters and who are not then also directors, such committee or other body may not exercise any power or authority reserved to the board of directors in articles 121 to 137 of this title, in the articles of incorporation, or in the bylaws.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 695, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

IP(4) and (6) amended, p. 2342, § 306, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2007:

(4)(f) amended, p. 249, § 52, effective May 29.